Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202553-123.15
Shipping license; when required; rights of licensee; application; contents; violation; disciplinary action; holder of license; duties; report; contents.

(1) No person shall order or receive alcoholic liquor in this state which has been shipped directly to him or her from outside this state by any person other than a holder of a shipping license issued by the commission, except that a licensed wholesaler may receive not more than three gallons of wine in any calendar year from any person who is not a holder of a shipping license.

(2) The commission may issue a shipping license to a manufacturer. Such license shall allow the licensee to ship alcoholic liquor only to a licensed wholesaler. A person who receives a license pursuant to this subsection shall pay the fee required in sections 53-124 and 53-124.01 for a manufacturer's shipping license. Such fee shall be collected by the commission and be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the General Fund, except that the fee received for a shipping license issued to a beer manufacturer pursuant to this subsection shall be credited to the Nebraska Beer Industry Promotional Fund.

(3) The commission may issue a shipping license to any person who deals with vintage wines, which shipping license shall allow the licensee to distribute such wines to a licensed wholesaler in the state. For purposes of distributing vintage wines, a licensed shipper must utilize a designated wholesaler if the manufacturer has a designated wholesaler. For purposes of this section, vintage wine shall mean a wine verified to be ten years of age or older and not available from a primary American source of supply. A person who receives a license pursuant to this subsection shall pay the fee required in sections 53-124 and 53-124.01 for a vintage wine dealer's shipping license. Such fee shall be collected by the commission and be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the General Fund.

(4) The commission may issue a shipping license to a wholesaler located outside the State of Nebraska. Such license shall allow the licensee to ship alcoholic liquor only to a licensed Nebraska wholesaler. A person who receives a license pursuant to this subsection shall pay the fee required in sections 53-124 and 53-124.01 for a wholesalers shipping license. Such fee shall be collected by the commission and be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the General Fund.

(5) The commission may issue a shipping license to any manufacturer who sells and ships alcoholic liquor from another state directly to a consumer in this state if the manufacturer satisfies the requirements of subsections (8) through (10) of this section. A manufacturer who receives a license pursuant to this subsection shall pay the fee required in sections 53-124 and 53-124.01 for a manufacture direct sales shipping license. Such fee shall be collected by the commission and remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Winery and Grape Producers Promotional Fund.

(6) The commission may issue a shipping license to any retailer who is licensed within or outside Nebraska, who is authorized to sell alcoholic liquor at retail in the state of domicile of the retailer, and who is not a manufacturer if such retailer satisfies the requirements of subsections (8) through (10) of this section to ship alcoholic liquor from another state directly to a consumer in this state. A retailer who receives a license pursuant to this subsection shall pay the fee required in sections 53-124 and 53-124.01 for a retail direct sales shipping license. Such fee shall be collected by the commission and remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Winery and Grape Producers Promotional Fund.

(7) The application for a shipping license under subsection (2) or (3) of this section shall be in such form as the commission prescribes. The application shall contain all provisions the commission deems proper and necessary to effectuate the purpose of any section of the act and the rules and regulations of the commission that apply to manufacturers and shall include, but not be limited to, provisions that the applicant, in consideration of the issuance of such shipping license, agrees:

(a) To comply with and be bound by sections 53-162 and 53-164.01 in making and filing reports, paying taxes, penalties, and interest, and keeping records;

(b) To permit and be subject to all of the powers granted by section 53-164.01 to the commission or its duly authorized employees or agents for inspection and examination of the applicant's premises and records and to pay the actual expenses, excluding salary, reasonably attributable to such inspections and examinations made by duly authorized employees of the commission if within the United States; and

(c) That if the applicant violates any of the provisions of the application or the license, any section of the act, or any of the rules and regulations of the commission that apply to manufacturers, the commission may suspend, cancel, or revoke such shipping license for such period of time as it may determine.

(8) The application for a shipping license under subsection (5) or (6) of this section shall be in such form as the commission prescribes. The application shall require an applicant which is a manufacturer, a craft brewery, a craft distillery, or a farm winery to identify the brands of alcoholic liquor that the applicant is requesting the authority to ship either into or within Nebraska. For all applicants, unless otherwise provided in this section, the application shall contain all provisions the commission deems proper and necessary to effectuate the purpose of any section of the act and the rules and regulations of the commission that apply to manufacturers or retailers and shall include, but not be limited to, provisions that the applicant, in consideration of the issuance of such shipping license, agrees:

(a) To comply with and be bound by sections 53-162 and 53-164.01 in making and filing reports, paying taxes, penalties, and interest, and keeping records;

(b) To permit and be subject to all of the powers granted by section 53-164.01 to the commission or its duly authorized employees or agents for inspection and examination of the applicant's premises and records and to pay the actual expenses, excluding salary, reasonably attributable to such inspections and examinations made by duly authorized employees of the commission if within the United States;

(c) That if the applicant violates any of the provisions of the application or the license, any section of the act, or any of the rules and regulations of the commission that apply to manufacturers or retailers, the commission may suspend, cancel, or revoke such shipping license for such period of time as it may determine;

(d) That the applicant agrees to notify the commission of any violations in the state in which he or she is domiciled and any violations of the direct shipping laws of any other states. Failure to notify the commission within thirty days after such a violation may result in a hearing before the commission pursuant to which the license may be suspended, canceled, or revoked; and

(e) That the applicant, if a manufacturer, craft brewery, craft distillery, or farm winery, agrees to notify any wholesaler licensed in Nebraska that has been authorized to distribute such brands that the application has been filed for a shipping license. The notice shall be in writing and in a form prescribed by the commission. The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations as it reasonably deems necessary to implement this subdivision, including rules and regulations that permit the holder of a shipping license under this subdivision to amend the shipping license by, among other things, adding or deleting any brands of alcoholic liquor identified in the shipping license.

(9) Any manufacturer or retailer who is granted a shipping license under subsection (5) or (6) of this section shall:

(a) Only ship the brands of alcoholic liquor identified on the application;

(b) Only ship alcoholic liquor that is owned by the holder of the shipping license;

(c) Only ship alcoholic liquor that is properly registered with the Alcohol and Tobacco Tax and Trade Bureau of the United States Department of the Treasury;

(d) Not ship any alcoholic liquor products that the manufacturers or wholesalers licensed in Nebraska have voluntarily agreed not to bring into Nebraska at the request of the commission;

(e) Not ship more than nine liters of alcoholic liquor per month to any person in Nebraska to whom alcoholic beverages may be lawfully sold. All such sales and shipments shall be for personal consumption only and not for resale; and

(f) Cause the direct shipment of alcoholic liquor to be by approved common carrier only. The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to which common carriers may apply for approval to provide common carriage of alcoholic liquor shipped by a holder of a shipping license issued pursuant to subsection (5) or (6) of this section. The rules and regulations shall include provisions that require (i) the recipient to demonstrate, upon delivery, that he or she is at least twenty-one years of age, (ii) the recipient to sign an electronic or paper form or other acknowledgment of receipt as approved by the commission, and (iii) the commission-approved common carrier to submit to the commission such information as the commission may prescribe. The commission-approved common carrier shall refuse delivery when the proposed recipient appears to be under the age of twenty-one years and refuses to present valid identification. All holders of shipping licenses shipping alcoholic liquor pursuant to this subdivision shall affix a conspicuous notice in sixteen-point type or larger to the outside of each package of alcoholic liquor shipped within or into the State of Nebraska, in a conspicuous location, stating: CONTAINS ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES; SIGNATURE OF PERSON AT LEAST 21 YEARS OF AGE REQUIRED FOR DELIVERY. Any delivery of alcoholic beverages to a minor by a common carrier shall constitute a violation by the common carrier. The common carrier and the holder of the shipping license shall be liable only for their independent acts.

(10) For purposes of sections 53-160, 77-2703, and 77-27,142, each shipment of alcoholic liquor by the holder of a shipping license under subsection (3), (5), or (6) of this section shall constitute a sale in Nebraska by establishing a nexus in the state. The holder of the shipping license shall collect all the taxes due to the State of Nebraska and any political subdivision and remit any excise taxes monthly to the commission and any sales taxes to the Department of Revenue.

(11) By July 1, 2014, the commission shall report to the General Affairs Committee of the Legislature the number of shipping licenses issued for license years 2013-14 and 2014-15. The report shall be made electronically.

Laws 1991, LB 344, § 49;

Laws 1994, LB 416, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 874, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 671, § 1;

Laws 2004, LB 485, § 14;

Laws 2007, LB441, § 1;

Laws 2010, LB861, § 55;

Laws 2010, LB867, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB286, § 1;

Laws 2013, LB230, § 1;

Laws 2015, LB330, § 13;

Laws 2016, LB1105, § 13;

Laws 2018, LB1120, § 10;

Laws 2025, LB478, § 3.